Utah statutes.
78B-6-604.   Refusing to exhibit authority for detention -- Penalty.

A person who refuses to deliver a copy of the legal process by which the person detains the plaintiff in custody to anyone who demands a copy for the purpose of filing a writ of habeas corpus is liable to the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed $200.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

